Massachusetts, session 194th, H1795.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 6B of chapter 231 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 5 and 6, the words “at the rate of
twelve per cent per annum” and inserting in place thereof the following:- calculated at a weekly
average one-year constant maturity treasury yield, as published by the Board of Governors of the
Federal Reserve System, for the calendar week preceding date of the judgment.
SECTION 2. Section 6C of said chapter 231 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 4 and 5, the words “at the rate
of twelve per cent per annum” and inserting in place thereof the following:- calculated at a
weekly average one-year constant maturity treasury yield, as published by the Board of
Governors of the Federal Reserve System, for the calendar week preceding date of the judgment.
of 2

SECTION 3. Said section 6C of said chapter 231 is hereby further amended by striking
out, in line 8, the words “at the rate of twelve per cent annum” and inserting in place thereof the
following:- calculated as set forth above.
of 2